Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 8. Works of Art in Public Buildings

§ 16-6-801.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Agency” means any state office, department, board, commission or institution and any community college district to which funds have been appropriated, bonded or otherwise provided by the state for the design and original construction of any new building;

“Architect” means any person licensed to practice architecture pursuant to W.S.

33-4-101

through

33-4-117

and designated as the project architect for a specific capital construction project;

“Artist” means any practitioner generally recognized by peers or critics as a professional who produces works of art;

“Building” means any permanent structure and any appurtenant structure intended to function as an office, courtroom, hearing or meeting room or other space for carrying on the operation of any agency and any auditorium, meeting room, classroom or other educational facility, library or museum space, or information center for use by the public, excluding utility lines, water projects, fish ponds, school buildings, city buildings, county buildings, public restrooms at state parks, separate structures which are not part of a larger construction project intended solely as storage, warehouse or maintenance and repair facilities;

“Construction cost” means the cost for the actual design and original construction of any new building which is funded in total or in part by appropriated state funds, excluding land acquisition. The phrase does not include the cost for any building funded in part by city or county funds;

“Department” means the department of state parks and cultural resources acting through the Wyoming arts council established under W.S.

9-2-901

;

“User” means that agency with principal administrative responsibility for the actual use of any building;

“Works of art” means any frescoe, mosaic, sculpture, drawing, painting, photograph, calligraphy, graphic art, stained glass, wall hanging, tapestry, fountain, ornamental gateway, monument, display, architectural embellishment, craft, architectural landscape or any work of mixed media by an artist.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 172, § 1; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(ii), substituted “33-4-117” for “33-4-115.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 16-6-802.
Construction of new public buildings; state funds.

The original construction of any new building shall include works of art for public display, which shall be included by the agency in determining total construction costs of the building at an amount equal to one percent (1%) of total costs but not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) on any one (1) project. Any new construction project for which the total cost is less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) is exempt from this subsection.

Prior to transferring or authorizing the expenditure of any state funds for the original construction of any new building, the state auditor shall transfer to the state treasurer an amount equal to the amount specified under subsection (a) of this section for works of art. Upon receipt, the state treasurer shall deposit the amount transferred into a separate account, together with any grants, gifts or other funds received or appropriated by the state for the sole purpose of acquiring works of art for placement in buildings. Amounts deposited within the separate account shall be expended by the department for the acquisition of works of art by purchase, lease, commission or otherwise, the maintenance of works of art placed in buildings pursuant to this article and for the administration of this article.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 172, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b), in the second sentence, deleted “within the general fund” following “into a separate account.”

Prospective application. —

Laws 1991, ch. 172, § 3, provides: “W.S. 16-6-802(a) shall apply only to any building which has not gone beyond the final design stage as of the effective date of this act.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 16-6-803.
Department of commerce to acquire works of art; advisory panel to consult in acquisition; procedure; public education programs.

In administering this article, the department shall in consultation with the advisory panel selected pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, designate works of art and sites for placement within buildings and shall accordingly and as necessary, select, purchase, commission, review, place, accept, sell, exchange or dispose of works of art.

The acquisition of works of art from funds within the separate account established under W.S. 16-6-802(b) shall not require advertisement for bids.

The department shall select a panel to serve in an advisory capacity to the department in selecting and designating works of art, comprised of representatives of the community in which the building is located, the user agency, the art community and the architect involved in the original construction of the building. Each panel member shall receive reimbursement for travel and per diem in the same amount and manner as by law provided for state employees.

The department shall by rule and regulation establish the jury procedure for works of art acquired under this article, which shall at minimum:

Give preference to Wyoming artists;

Prohibit consideration of any work of art of any panel member or a member of his immediate family for the project on which the panel member is serving;

Require cooperation and communication with local and national art agencies;

Provide a process for the transfer of acquired works of art from one (1) location to another.

The department may, upon request of any agency, authorize the acquisition of works of art through the pooling of funds available from small, multiple new construction projects and through the use of funds within the separate account as matching any funds available from nonstate sources.

In addition to other duties imposed under this article, the department shall develop and implement public education programs on the purpose of this article, the process for selecting works of art for placement in buildings, the state art collection and on the acquired works of art.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 172, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), substituted “W.S. 16-6-802(b)” for “W.S. 16-6-202(b).”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “general fund” preceding “account” in (b) and (e).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction and effect of state and local laws requiring governmental units to give “purchase preference” to goods manufactured or services performed in state, 84 ALR4th 419.

§ 16-6-804.
Acquisitions property of state art collection; maintenance; expenses.

Upon acquisition of any work of art in accordance with this article, the work of art becomes the property of the state art collection and the department, through the state museum, shall:

Maintain an inventory of the acquired work of art;

Maintain and preserve the work of art; and

Periodically review and examine the acquired work of art and report to the director of the department on any necessary restoration, repair, deaccession or replacement of the work of art.

The expenses incurred by the department in performing duties imposed under this section shall be paid from the separate account established under W.S. 16-6-802(b), which shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total amount expended for any specific work of art.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 172, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b), deleted “general fund” preceding “account.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 16-6-805.
Application.

Nothing in this article shall limit the acquisition or placement of works of art acquired from other nonstate sources nor shall this article limit the use of architectural, functional or structural detailing or garnishing in the construction, remodeling, renovation or restoration of any building.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 172, § 1.